src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON MUS_NOUN   !!≈ * **@CODE@** type uáiváámus, aldemus 
+N+Sg+Nom:s K ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:u K ; 
+N+Sg+Acc:u K ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>in K ; 
+N+Sg+Loc:%>ust K ; 
+N+Sg+Com:%>in K ; 
+N+Sg+Abe:%>uttáá K ; 
+N+Ess:žž%>ân K ; 
+N+Par:žž%>âd K ; 
+N+Pl+Nom:%>uh K ; 
+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>sah K ; ! 11 uáiváámusah in corp 
+N+Pl+Gen:%>i K ; 
+N+Pl+Acc:%>id K ; 
+N+Pl+Ill:%>id K ; 
+N+Pl+Loc:%>in K ; 
+N+Pl+Com:%>i GUIN ; 
+N+Pl+Abe:%>ittáá K ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:s Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:u Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i Rhash ; 
 
+N+Sg+Nom:%>á VPXsuff12nom ;  ! XXX check! 
+N+Sg+Gen:%>á VPXsuff12 ;     ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:%>á VPXsuff12 ;     ! 
+N+Sg+Nom:%>á VPXsuff3 ;      ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:%>á VPXsuff3 ;      ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:%>á VPXsuff3 ;      ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>ás CPXsuff ;      ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:%>ást CPXsuff ;     ! 
+N+Sg+Com:%>áin CPXsuff ;     ! 
+N+Ess:%>ná VPXsuff12 ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 



 
!! ## Odd-syllable stems 
!    =================== 
 
LEXICON 3KOMPAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** stem kompass An odd loan word with the final -s lengthening 
+N: X_KOMPAS ; ! the cases 
+N:  X_eh_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen: Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom: CPXsuff ;  ! kompassân 
+N+Sg+Gen: CPXsuff ;  ! kompassân 
+N+Sg+Acc: CPXsuff ;  ! kompassân 
+N+Sg+Ill: CPXsuff ;  ! kompassân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^FCD%>ist CPXsuff ; ! kompasistân 
+N+Sg+Com:^FCD%>ijn CPXsuff ;  ! kompasijnân 
 
 
LEXICON X_KOMPAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^FCD K ; ! kompas 
+Sg+Gen:^FCD K ; ! kompas 
+Sg+Acc:^FCD K ; ! kompas 
+Sg+Ill:%>ân K ; ! kompassân 
+Sg+Loc:%>ist K ; ! kompassist 
+Sg+Com:%>áin K ; ! kompassáin 
+Sg+Abe:^FCD%>ttáá K ; ! kompasttáá 
+Ess:%>in K ; ! kompassin 
+Ess:%>in CPXsuff ; ! kompassin 
+Par:%>id K ; ! kompassid 
 
 
 
LEXICON 3KEPIDEM  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N+Sg+Nom:em K ;                          ! kepidem 
+N+Sg+Gen:em K ;                          ! kepidem 
+N+Sg+Acc:em K ;                          ! kepidem 
+N+Sg+Ill:m^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN%>ân K ;        ! keeppidmân 
+N+Sg+Loc:m^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN%>ist K ;       ! keeppidmist 
+N+Sg+Com:m^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN%>áin K ;       ! keeppidmáin 
+N+Sg+Abe:em%>ttáá K ;                    ! kepidemttáá 
+N+Ess:m^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN%>in K ;           ! keeppidmin   
+N+Par:m^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN%>id K ;           ! keeppidmid   
+N+Sg+Nom:^CLEN^RLEN%>mâ VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CLEN^RLEN%>mâ VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CLEN^RLEN%>mâ VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom:%>mi VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:%>mi VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:%>mi VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>ems CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:%>emst CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>emest CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Com:%>emijn CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Ess:m^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN%>in CPXsuff ;  ! keeppidmin   
3KEPIDEM_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 3KEPIDEM_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:em Rhash ; 
+N:m^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN X_eh_PL ; 
+N:em%> Nom_DER ; 
+N:em%> Gen_DER ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^CLEN^RLEN%>mijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^CLEN^RLEN%>mijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^CLEN^RLEN%>mijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^CLEN^RLEN%>mijn CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^CLEN^RLEN%>mijd CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 
 
LEXICON 3POTTAAK  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_POTTAAK ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^SC^CSH^SVSH 4C_RASTAGAS_SG ; !njuámmilâš 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^SC^CSH^SVSH 4C_RASTAGAS_PL ; !njuámmilâš 
 
LEXICON X_POTTAAK !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;     ! pottáák 
+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: Rhash ; 
+Cmp/PlGen:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ij Rhash ; 
+Sg+Gen: K ;       ! pottáák 
+Sg+Acc: K ;        ! pottáák 
+Sg+Ill:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ân K ;        ! potákkân 
+Sg+Loc:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ist K ;       ! potákkist 
+Sg+Com:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>áin K ;       ! potákkáin 
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;                  ! pottáákttáá 
+Ess:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>in K ;           ! potákkin 
+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;                  ! pottááknân 
+Par:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>id K ;           ! potákkid 
:^SC^CSH^SVSH X_eh_PL ; 
+Sg+Nom:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>â VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+Sg+Nom:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+Sg+Gen:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+Sg+Acc:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+Sg+Gen:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+Sg+Acc:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ;                        !  pottááksân 
+Sg+Loc:%>st CPXsuff ;                       ! pottáákstân 
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ist CPXsuff ; ! potákkistân 
+Sg+Com:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;  !  
+Pl+Acc:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;                 !   
+Pl+Gen:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;                 !   
+Pl+Ill:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;                 !   
+Pl+Loc:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;                 !   
+Pl+Com:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;                 !   
 Nom_DER ; 
 Gen_DER ; 
 
 
LEXICON 3EEMEED  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
3EEMEED_SG ; 
3EEMEED_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_EEMEED  !!≈ * **@CODE@** stem: eemeed
X_EEMEED_SG ; 
 :^CSH^SVSH X_eh_PL ; 
 
 
LEXICON 3EEMEED_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_EEMEED_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen: Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CSH^SVSH%>â VPXsuff12nom ; ! emedâm 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CSH^SVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;     ! emedis 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CSH^SVSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;    ! emedân 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CSH^SVSH%>â VPXsuff12 ;    ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^CSH^SVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;     ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^CSH^SVSH%>i VPXsuff3 ;     ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ;               ! eemeedsân 
+N+Sg+Loc:%>st CPXsuff ;              ! eemeedstân 
+N+Sg+Com:^CSH^SVSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;    ! emedijnân 
+N:%> Gen_DER ; ! 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; !eennâmlâš 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^CSH^SVSH 3EEMEED_SG_DIM ; !njuámmilâš 

 
LEXICON 3EEMEED_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:^CSH^SVSH X_eh_PL ; 
+N+Err/Orth:^SVSH X_eh_PL ; ! myevvireh pro correct myevireh 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^CSH^SVSH%>ij Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^CSH^SVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^CSH^SVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! emedijdis 
+N+Pl+Ill:^CSH^SVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^CSH^SVSH%>ijn CPXsuff ;  ! emedijnis 
+N+Pl+Com:^CSH^SVSH%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! emedijdiskijn 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^CSH^SVSH 3EEMEED_PL_DIM ; !njuámmilâš 

LEXICON X_EEMEED_SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;                 ! eemeed 
+Sg+Gen: K ;                 ! eemeed 
+Sg+Acc: K ;                 ! eemeed 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^SVSH%>ân K ;    ! emedân 
+Sg+Loc:^CSH^SVSH%>ist K ;   ! emedist 
+Sg+Com:^CSH^SVSH%>áin K ;   ! emedáin 
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;           ! eemeedttáá 
+Ess:^CSH^SVSH%>in K ;       ! emedin 
+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;           ! eemeednân 
+Par:^CSH^SVSH%>id K ;       ! emedid 
 
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:^SVSH%>ân K ;        ! myevvirân pro correct myevirân 
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:^SVSH%>ist K ;        ! 
+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:^SVSH%>áin K ;        ! 
+Ess+Err/Orth:^SVSH%>in K ;        
+Par+Err/Orth:^SVSH%>id K ;        
 
LEXICON 3LITTER !!≈ * **@CODE@** MO Ib 2nd syll vowel does not alternate 
3LITTER_SG ; 
3LITTER_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_LITTER !!≈ * **@CODE@** MO Ib 2nd syll vowel does not alternate 
X_LITTER_SG ; 
X_eh_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_LITTER_not_Par !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for numerals 
 X_LITTER_SG_not_Par ; 
 X_eh_PL ; 
 
 
 
LEXICON 3LITTER_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_LITTER_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen: Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:%>â VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom:%>i VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: CPXsuff ;        
+N+Sg+Gen: CPXsuff ;        
+N+Sg+Loc:%>st CPXsuff ; 
+N+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ist CPXsuff ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ;        
+N+Sg+Com:%>ijn CPXsuff ;        ! ustevijnân 
+N:%> Gen_DER ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:á 4C_RASTAGAS_SG ; !njuámmilâš 
 
LEXICON 3LITTER_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_eh_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;  ! vaanhimijdiskuin ustevijdângui 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:á 4C_RASTAGAS_PL ; !njuámmilâš 
 
 
LEXICON X_LITTER_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 +Par:%>id K ; 
X_LITTER_SG_not_Par ; 
 
 
LEXICON X_LITTER_SG_not_Par !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for numerals 
 +Sg+Nom: K ; 
 +Sg+Gen: K ; 
 +Sg+Acc: K ; 
 +Sg+Ill:%>ân K ; 
 +Sg+Loc:%>ist K ; 
 +Sg+Com:%>áin K ; 
 +Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ; 
 +Ess:%>in K ; 
 +Ess:%>n CPXsuff ; ! litternân 
 
 
 
