src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
kinnáleh+Sem/Dummytag:kinnál 3LITTER_PL "" ;
haskuleh+Sem/Dummytag:haskul 3LITTER_PL "" ;
vanhimeh+Sem/Dummytag:vanhim 3LITTER_PL "" ;
vuoivâšneh+Sem/Dummytag:vuoivâšn 3LITTER_PL "" ;
uđđâseh+Sem/Dummytag:uđđâs 3LITTER_PL "uutiset" ;
eehiduđđâseh+Sem/Dummytag:eehid#uđđâs 3LITTER_PL "iltauutiset" ;
kyever+Sem/Dummytag:kyever 3EEMEED "haara" ;
irrát+Sem/Dummytag:irrát 3POTTAAK "suude" ;
njäviltiimaal+Sem/Dummytag:njävil#tiimaal 3EEMEED "viiksitimali" ;
klusiil+Sem/Dummytag:klusiil 3LITTER "klusiili" ;
epimeetaal+Sem/Dummytag:epi#meetaal 3POTTAAK "epämetalli" ;
akvarel+Sem/Dummytag:akvarel 3POTTAAK "akvarelli" ;
tyyraan+Sem/Dummytag:tyyraan 3POTTAAK "tyranni" ;
oohtânpeškittem+Sem/Event:oohtân#pe^RVškitt 3KEPIDEM "kolari" ;
kompas+Sem/Dummytag:kompass 3KOMPAS "kompassi" ;
abstrakt+Sem/Dummytag:abstrakt 3LITTER "abstrakti" ;
prooteest+Sem/Dummytag:prooteest 3EEMEED "protesti" ;
aldemus+Sem/Hum:aldemu MUS_NOUN "lähimmäinen" ;
kolonisistem+Sem/Dummytag:kolonisist 3KEPIDEM "kolonisaatio" ; ! XXX check
etinummeer+Sem/Dummytag:eti#nummeer 3EEMEED "hätänumero" ;
iäláneh+Sem/Dummytag:iälán 3EEMEED_PL "eliöstö" ;
uáiváámus+Sem/Hum:uái4váámu MUS_NOUN "valtias" ;
veridem+Sem/Dummytag:ve^RVr^RCid 3KEPIDEM "väärennös" ;
nuorâmus+Sem/Dummytag:nuorâmu MUS_NOUN "kuopus" ;
áimukuškâdem+Sem/Dummytag:ái4mu#kuškâd 3KEPIDEM "ilmakuivatus" ;
njuálguviälgum+Sem/Dummytag:njuálgu#viälgum 3LITTER "suoraveloitus" ;
macâttem+Sem/Dummytag:ma^RVcâtt 3KEPIDEM "palautus" ;
sierânistem+Sem/Dummytag:sierânist 3KEPIDEM "eristys" ;
kumistevileh+Sem/Dummytag:kumi#steevvil 3EEMEED_PL "kumisaappaat" ;
keriveh+Sem/Dummytag:ke^RVrriv 3EEMEED_PL "käräjät" ;
madârvanhimeh+Sem/Hum:madâr#vanhim 3LITTER_PL "esivanhemmat" ;
koččomeh+Sem/Dummytag:koččom 3LITTER_PL "kutsunnat" ;
vuárbádmeh+Sem/Dummytag:vuárbád 3KEPIDEM_PL "arpajaiset" ;
njävileh+Sem/Dummytag:njävvil 3EEMEED_PL "viikset" ;
mannasuvrâmeh+Sem/Dummytag:manna#suvrâm 3LITTER_PL "mannasuurimot" ;
olgosadelem+Sem/Dummytag:olgos#ad^RCel 3KEPIDEM "julkaisu" ;
piäldutubbáák+Sem/Food_Plant:piäldu#tubbáák 3POTTAAK "kessu" ;
piivnoh+Sem/Dummytag:piivnoh 3EEMEED ;
kuommâm+Sem/Dummytag:kuommâm 3EEMEED "aavistus" ;
piähum+Sem/Dummytag:piähum 3EEMEED ;
mooreen+Sem/Dummytag:mooreen 3EEMEED ;
saabaat+Sem/Dummytag:saabaat 3EEMEED ;
spaagaat+v1+Sem/Dummytag:spaagaat 3POTTAAK ;
hiärvástâllâmrakkeet+Sem/Dummytag:hiärvástâllâm#rakkeet 3POTTAAK ;
miinuut+v1+Sem/Dummytag:miinuut 3POTTAAK ;
šlotureh+Sem/Dummytag:šlotur 3EEMEED_PL ;
ištâdem+Sem/Dummytag:ištâd 3KEPIDEM ;
njárbudem+Sem/Dummytag:njá^RVrbud 3KEPIDEM ; ! njá'rbudem
patârem+Sem/Dummytag:pa^RVt^RCâr 3KEPIDEM ;
olgoštem+Sem/Dummytag:olgo^SVšt 3KEPIDEM ;
vyenttem+Sem/Dummytag:vyenttem 3LITTER ;
pianism+Sem/Dummytag:pianism 3LITTER ;
erotism+Sem/Dummytag:erotism 3LITTER ;
tetanus+Sem/Dummytag:tetanus 3LITTER ;
ijjâhaigar+Sem/Ani-bird:ijjâ#hai4gar 3LITTER "yöhaikara" ;
intres+Sem/Feat-psych:intress 3KOMPAS "intressi" ;	!¢intressáin, intressist, intressân, intres tags_via_apertium
ištâmeh+Sem/Clth:ištâm 3LITTER_PL "persaus" ; ! tags_via_apertium
juuriist+Sem/Hum:juuriist 3EEMEED "juristi" ;	!YAML ¢juristáin, juristist, juristân, juuriist tags_via_apertium
kompromis+Sem/Prod-cogn:kompromiss 3KOMPAS "kompromissi" ; ! tags_via_apertium
meetaal+Sem/Mat:meetaal 3POTTAAK ; ! b VV X VV	!¢metalláin, metallist, metallân, meetaal tags_via_apertium
mieskâruáđiheh+Sem/Plant-fungus:mieskâ#ruáđih 3EEMEED_PL "lahorusokkaat" ;
politijkká+Err/Lex+Sem/Domain:politijkká 3POTTAAK "politiikka" ;  ! tags_via_apertium
räniskiirjâgkässih+Sem/Plant-fungus:räniskiirjâg#kässih 3LITTER "harmaakirjovahakas" ;
suáldát+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Hum:suáldát 3POTTAAK "sotilas" ; !b D XY V	!¢suáldáttáin, suáldáttist, suáldáttân, suáldát tags_via_apertium
tavevielgisluobbâsk+Sem/Plant:tavevielgis#luobbâsk 3EEMEED "pohjanlumme" ;
hävdidmeh+Sem/Event:hävdid 3KEPIDEM_PL "hautajaiset" ;
hävdidmeh+Err/Orth+Sem/Event:häävdid 3KEPIDEM_PL "hautajaiset" ;
merkumatiliininatrium+Sem/Dummytag:merkumatiliininatrium 3LITTER ;
